Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-4627
Termination by operation of law of temporary grant of custodial responsibility established by court order.

(a) If an agreement between the parties to terminate a temporary order for custodial responsibility under sections 43-4613 to 43-4623 has not been filed, the order terminates sixty days after the deploying parent gives notice to the other parent and any nonparent granted custodial responsibility that the deploying parent has returned from deployment.

(b) A proceeding seeking to prevent termination of a temporary order for custodial responsibility is governed by law of this state other than the Uniform Deployed Parents Custody and Visitation Act.

Laws 2015, LB219, § 27.